Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.100

Local tourism promotion account created.

The local tourism promotion account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the charges for tourism promotion must be deposited into this account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for tourism promotion. The state treasurer shall distribute the money in the account on a monthly basis to the legislative authority on whose behalf the money was collected.

[ 2003 c 148 s 10.]